District of Columbia statutes.
21-2405.01

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018

Section References

This section is referenced in § 21-2405.03.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 501 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.